Louisiana, session 2026, SB21.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:102.1(A)(4)(c)(iv) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
11:102.1(A)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§102.1. Amortization payment schedules; priority excess return allocations;
Louisiana State Employees' Retirement System
A.(1) * * *
* * *
(4) For purposes of this Section, the following shall apply:
* * *
(c) "Secondary priority amount" shall mean the maximum amount of system
returns in excess of the system's actuarially assumed rate of return that may be
applied to the experience account amortization base, regardless of whether actual
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 21 ENROLLED
returns that equal or exceed the maximum are available, and shall equal:
* * *
(iv) For the first valuation after the original amortization base is liquidated,
the portion of the prior year's primary priority amount that was necessary to liquidate
the original amortization base plus the prior year's secondary priority amount, both
increased by the percentage increase in the system's actuarial value of assets for the
prior year, if any the provisions of this Paragraph shall terminate.
* * *
(h)(5)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (i) of this
Paragraph any other provision of this Section, effective for the June thirtieth
valuation following the fiscal year in which the system first attains a funded
percentage of eighty or more pursuant to R.S. 11:542 and for each valuation
thereafter, the net remaining liability of the any amortization base to which the any
additional funds are applied shall be reamortized with annual level-dollar payments
calculated as provided in R.S. 11:102 over the remainder of the amortization period
originally established for that amortization base.
(i)(b) Beginning with Fiscal Year 2019-2020 and every fifth fiscal year
thereafter, the remaining liability net of all payments made since the last
reamortization shall be reamortized over the remainder of the amortization period
originally established for that amortization base with annual payments calculated as
provided for in this Section.
(j)(c) Except as provided in Subparagraphs (h) and (i) (a) and (b) of this
Paragraph and in Item (B)(3)(a)(iv) of this Section, the net remaining liability of the
amortization base to which the funds are applied shall not be reamortized after such
application.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 11:102.1(A)(4)(c)(v), (e)(ii) and (iii), and (h) through (j) are hereby
repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 21 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.